Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 73 Education — Social Services
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-73-1.
Legislative findings.

It is found and declared that:

All children are capable of success and schools are the centers of vibrant communities. The growing social needs of children directly affect their ability to perform successfully in school because health, emotional, social, and family problems can impede learning.

Schools are most effective when families take active roles in the education of children. Community schools are in a unique position to provide the vital links between education, social services, and health care to children and their families.

It is important that schools be assisted in fulfilling the critical function of coordinating the delivery of comprehensive social services at or near the site of public schools to address the particular needs of each school community.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 465, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 215, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 257, § 2.

16-73-1.1.
Definition.

“Child opportunity zone,” Rhode Island’s community school initiative, means a site at or near a school that provides: early childhood initiatives; before-school, after-school, and summer enrichment programs; health and mental health services; parent engagement, adult education, workforce development training; or any combination of these programs based upon the students and the community’s needs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 215, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 257, § 3.

16-73-2.
Creation of plan.

The children’s cabinet shall incorporate into its strategic plan “child opportunity zones” as a means to deliver comprehensive and coordinated social services at or near public school sites. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall undertake activities including, but not limited to, the award of and administration of grants to further the purpose set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 465, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 215, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 257, § 2.

16-73-3.
Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education may promulgate any rules and regulations that are deemed necessary for the purpose of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 465, § 1.

16-73-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 465, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 60, effective July 6, 2001.

16-73-5.
Purpose.

The purpose of child opportunity zones is to implement programs related to the specific community needs that ultimately increase student performance in school. The child opportunity zone shall provide a means to integrate education, health, and social services into schools and link families to the school and community resources. The child opportunity zone may operate programs, including, but not limited to: early childhood initiatives; before-school, after-school and summer enrichment; family engagement initiatives; adult education and family literacy programs based upon community needs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 215, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 257, § 3.

16-73-6.
Reporting.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall provide an annual report by August 1 of each year to the president of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives regarding the number of children and families served, and appropriate outcome data for each program operated by a child opportunity zone.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 215, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 257, § 3.